District of Columbia statutes.
29-908

Bylaws; adoption, amendment, or repeal.

Bylaws shall be adopted, amended, or repealed by at least a majority vote of the members voting.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-908.
1981 Ed., § 29-1108.
1973 Ed., § 29-808.